Hawaii statutes.
§576B-616 Procedure to register child
support order of foreign country for modification. A party or support
enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child
support order not under the Convention may register that order in this State
under sections 576B-601 through 576B-608 if the order has not been registered.
A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for
registration, or at another time. The petition shall specify the grounds for
modification. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next